District of Columbia statutes.
16-5306

Form of unsworn declaration.

An unsworn declaration under this chapter shall be in substantially the following form:

“I declare under penalty of perjury under the law of the District of Columbia that the foregoing is true and correct, and that I am physically located outside the geographic boundaries of the United States, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, and any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Executed on the date day of month, year, at

(city or other location, and state), (country):

(printed name)

(signature).”

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-191, § 2(b), 57 DCR 3400
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 75(d), 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 22-2402.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made stylistic changes.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act.